District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-616

License to confer degrees — Application; filing and recordation; use of public school personnel authorized.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 586c
Mar. 2, 1929, 45 Stat. 1504, ch. 523
Nov. 7, 1966, 80 Stat. 1430, Pub. L. 89-791, title I, § 106
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-104, § 6(a)(2), 23 DCR 8734
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(v)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 4004(b)(2), 52 DCR 7503
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-616.
1981 Ed., § 29-816.
1973 Ed., § 29-416.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4004(b)(2) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).